Massachusetts, session 194th, H1046.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. As used in this Act, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
"Combined Sewer System" is a wastewater collection system of a municipality or of a
Publicly Owned Treatment Works that conveys sanitary wastewater (domestic, commercial, and
industrial wastewaters) and stormwater through a single-pipe system to a treatment plant.
“Combined Sewer Overflow” is a discharge or release from a Combined Sewer System
directly or indirectly to a water of the commonwealth at a point prior to a Publicly Owned
Treatment Works Treatment Plant.
"EEA" is the Executive Office of Energy and Environmental Affairs.
SECTION 2. Any entity, public or private that owns or operates a combined sewer
system that discharges combined sewage into a Massachusetts waterway shall eliminate all
combined sewer overflows into Massachusetts waterways by December 31, 2050.
of 2

SECTION 3. The EEA shall, within six months of the effective date of this Act, establish
interim metrics and benchmarks to monitor progress toward the elimination of combined sewer
overflows. These metrics shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Interim reduction targets for combined sewer system discharges discharges;
(b) Reporting requirements for entities owning or operating combined sewer systems.
SECTION 4. The EEA shall report annually to the General Court and the public on
progress toward eliminating combined sewer overflows, including compliance with interim
metrics and any barriers to implementation.
of 2